Hawaii statutes.
§161-38 Dead, dying, disabled, or diseased
poultry. No person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or
transporting in intrastate commerce dead, dying, disabled, or diseased poultry,
or any parts or carcasses of any poultry that died otherwise than by slaughter,
shall buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for
transportation in intrastate commerce any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased
poultry or parts or carcasses of any poultry that died otherwise than by
slaughter, unless the transaction or transportation is made in accordance with
rules that the board may adopt to assure that the poultry, or the unwholesome
parts or products thereof, will be prevented from being used for human food
purposes. [L 1969, c 212, §25; am L 1993, c 92, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next